Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-118 Hearing procedure and judicial
review. (a) Any insurer or rating organization aggrieved by any order or
decision of the commissioner made without a hearing, may, within thirty days
after notice of the order to the insurer or organization, make written request
to the commissioner for a hearing. The commissioner shall hold a hearing
within twenty days after receipt of the request, and shall give not less than
ten days' written notice of the time and place of the hearing. Within fifteen
days after the hearing, the commissioner shall affirm, reverse, or modify the
commissioner's previous action, specifying the reasons for the commissioner's
decision. Pending the hearing and decision, the commissioner may suspend or
postpone the effective date of the commissioner's previous action.

(b) Any final order or decision of the
commissioner may be reviewed in the circuit court of the first circuit, and an
appeal from the decision of the court shall lie to the intermediate appellate
court, subject to chapter 602. The review shall be taken and had in the manner
provided in chapter 91. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 202, §49; am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next